Illinois, session 104th, HB5508.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Section 19 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 305/19)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.19)7    Sec. 19. Any disputed questions of law or fact shall be 8determined as herein provided.9    (a) It shall be the duty of the Commission upon 10notification that the parties have failed to reach an 11agreement, to designate an Arbitrator.12        1. Whenever any claimant misconceives his remedy and 13    files an application for adjustment of claim under this 14    Act and it is subsequently discovered, at any time before 15    final disposition of such cause, that the claim for 16    disability or death which was the basis for such 17    application should properly have been made under the 18    Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, then the provisions of 19    Section 19, paragraph (a-1) of the Workers' Occupational 20    Diseases Act having reference to such application shall 21    apply.22        2. Whenever any claimant misconceives his remedy and 23    files an application for adjustment of claim under the   HB5508- 2 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1    Workers' Occupational Diseases Act and it is subsequently 2    discovered, at any time before final disposition of such 3    cause that the claim for injury or death which was the 4    basis for such application should properly have been made 5    under this Act, then the application so filed under the 6    Workers' Occupational Diseases Act may be amended in form, 7    substance or both to assert claim for such disability or 8    death under this Act and it shall be deemed to have been so 9    filed as amended on the date of the original filing 10    thereof, and such compensation may be awarded as is 11    warranted by the whole evidence pursuant to this Act. When 12    such amendment is submitted, further or additional 13    evidence may be heard by the Arbitrator or Commission when 14    deemed necessary. Nothing in this Section contained shall 15    be construed to be or permit a waiver of any provisions of 16    this Act with reference to notice but notice if given 17    shall be deemed to be a notice under the provisions of this 18    Act if given within the time required herein.19    (b) The Arbitrator shall make such inquiries and 20investigations as he or they shall deem necessary and may 21examine and inspect all books, papers, records, places, or 22premises relating to the questions in dispute and hear such 23proper evidence as the parties may submit.24    The hearings before the Arbitrator shall be held in the 25vicinity where the injury occurred after 10 days' notice of 26the time and place of such hearing shall have been given to   HB5508- 3 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1each of the parties or their attorneys of record.2    The Arbitrator may find that the disabling condition is 3temporary and has not yet reached a permanent condition and 4may order the payment of compensation up to the date of the 5hearing, which award shall be reviewable and enforceable in 6the same manner as other awards, and in no instance be a bar to 7a further hearing and determination of a further amount of 8temporary total compensation or of compensation for permanent 9disability, but shall be conclusive as to all other questions 10except the nature and extent of said disability.11    The decision of the Arbitrator shall be filed with the 12Commission which Commission shall immediately send to each 13party or his attorney a copy of such decision, together with a 14notification of the time when it was filed. As of the effective 15date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly, all 16decisions of the Arbitrator shall set forth in writing 17findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated, if 18requested by either party. Unless a petition for review is 19filed by either party within 30 days after the receipt by such 20party of the copy of the decision and notification of time when 21filed, and unless such party petitioning for a review shall 22within 35 days after the receipt by him of the copy of the 23decision, file with the Commission either an agreed statement 24of the facts appearing upon the hearing before the Arbitrator, 25or if such party shall so elect a correct transcript of 26evidence of the proceedings at such hearings, then the   HB5508- 4 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1decision shall become the decision of the Commission and in 2the absence of fraud shall be conclusive. The Petition for 3Review shall contain a statement of the petitioning party's 4specific exceptions to the decision of the arbitrator. The 5jurisdiction of the Commission to review the decision of the 6arbitrator shall not be limited to the exceptions stated in 7the Petition for Review. The Commission, or any member 8thereof, may grant further time not exceeding 30 days, in 9which to file such agreed statement or transcript of evidence. 10Such agreed statement of facts or correct transcript of 11evidence, as the case may be, shall be authenticated by the 12signatures of the parties or their attorneys, and in the event 13they do not agree as to the correctness of the transcript of 14evidence it shall be authenticated by the signature of the 15Arbitrator designated by the Commission.16    Whether the employee is working or not, if the employee is 17not receiving or has not received medical, surgical, or 18hospital services or other services or compensation as 19provided in paragraph (a) of Section 8, or compensation as 20provided in paragraph (b) of Section 8, the employee may at any 21time petition for an expedited hearing by an Arbitrator on the 22issue of whether or not he or she is entitled to receive 23payment of the services or compensation. Provided the employer 24continues to pay compensation pursuant to paragraph (b) of 25Section 8, the employer may at any time petition for an 26expedited hearing on the issue of whether or not the employee   HB5508- 5 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1is entitled to receive medical, surgical, or hospital services 2or other services or compensation as provided in paragraph (a) 3of Section 8, or compensation as provided in paragraph (b) of 4Section 8. When an employer has petitioned for an expedited 5hearing, the employer shall continue to pay compensation as 6provided in paragraph (b) of Section 8 unless the arbitrator 7renders a decision that the employee is not entitled to the 8benefits that are the subject of the expedited hearing or 9unless the employee's treating physician has released the 10employee to return to work at his or her regular job with the 11employer or the employee actually returns to work at any other 12job. If the arbitrator renders a decision that the employee is 13not entitled to the benefits that are the subject of the 14expedited hearing, a petition for review filed by the employee 15shall receive the same priority as if the employee had filed a 16petition for an expedited hearing by an Arbitrator. Neither 17party shall be entitled to an expedited hearing when the 18employee has returned to work and the sole issue in dispute 19amounts to less than 12 weeks of unpaid compensation pursuant 20to paragraph (b) of Section 8.21    Expedited hearings shall have priority over all other 22petitions and shall be heard by the Arbitrator and Commission 23with all convenient speed. Any party requesting an expedited 24hearing shall give notice of a request for an expedited 25hearing under this paragraph. A copy of the Application for 26Adjustment of Claim shall be attached to the notice. The   HB5508- 6 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1Commission shall adopt rules and procedures under which the 2final decision of the Commission under this paragraph is filed 3not later than 180 days from the date that the Petition for 4Review is filed with the Commission.5    Where 2 or more insurance carriers, private self-insureds, 6or a group workers' compensation pool under Article V 3/4 of 7the Illinois Insurance Code dispute coverage for the same 8injury, any such insurance carrier, private self-insured, or 9group workers' compensation pool may request an expedited 10hearing pursuant to this paragraph to determine the issue of 11coverage, provided coverage is the only issue in dispute and 12all other issues are stipulated and agreed to and further 13provided that all compensation benefits including medical 14benefits pursuant to Section 8(a) continue to be paid to or on 15behalf of petitioner. Any insurance carrier, private 16self-insured, or group workers' compensation pool that is 17determined to be liable for coverage for the injury in issue 18shall reimburse any insurance carrier, private self-insured, 19or group workers' compensation pool that has paid benefits to 20or on behalf of petitioner for the injury. 21    (b-1) If the employee is not receiving medical, surgical 22or hospital services as provided in paragraph (a) of Section 8 23or compensation as provided in paragraph (b) of Section 8, the 24employee, in accordance with Commission Rules, may file a 25petition for an emergency hearing by an Arbitrator on the 26issue of whether or not he is entitled to receive payment of   HB5508- 7 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1such compensation or services as provided therein. Such 2petition shall have priority over all other petitions and 3shall be heard by the Arbitrator and Commission with all 4convenient speed.5    Such petition shall contain the following information and 6shall be served on the employer at least 15 days before it is 7filed:8        (i) the date and approximate time of accident;9        (ii) the approximate location of the accident;10        (iii) a description of the accident;11        (iv) the nature of the injury incurred by the 12    employee;13        (v) the identity of the person, if known, to whom the 14    accident was reported and the date on which it was 15    reported;16        (vi) the name and title of the person, if known, 17    representing the employer with whom the employee conferred 18    in any effort to obtain compensation pursuant to paragraph 19    (b) of Section 8 of this Act or medical, surgical or 20    hospital services pursuant to paragraph (a) of Section 8 21    of this Act and the date of such conference;22        (vii) a statement that the employer has refused to pay 23    compensation pursuant to paragraph (b) of Section 8 of 24    this Act or for medical, surgical or hospital services 25    pursuant to paragraph (a) of Section 8 of this Act;26        (viii) the name and address, if known, of each witness   HB5508- 8 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1    to the accident and of each other person upon whom the 2    employee will rely to support his allegations;3        (ix) the dates of treatment related to the accident by 4    medical practitioners, and the names and addresses of such 5    practitioners, including the dates of treatment related to 6    the accident at any hospitals and the names and addresses 7    of such hospitals, and a signed authorization permitting 8    the employer to examine all medical records of all 9    practitioners and hospitals named pursuant to this 10    paragraph;11        (x) a copy of a signed report by a medical 12    practitioner, relating to the employee's current inability 13    to return to work because of the injuries incurred as a 14    result of the accident or such other documents or 15    affidavits which show that the employee is entitled to 16    receive compensation pursuant to paragraph (b) of Section 17    8 of this Act or medical, surgical or hospital services 18    pursuant to paragraph (a) of Section 8 of this Act. Such 19    reports, documents or affidavits shall state, if possible, 20    the history of the accident given by the employee, and 21    describe the injury and medical diagnosis, the medical 22    services for such injury which the employee has received 23    and is receiving, the physical activities which the 24    employee cannot currently perform as a result of any 25    impairment or disability due to such injury, and the 26    prognosis for recovery;  HB5508- 9 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1        (xi) complete copies of any reports, records, 2    documents and affidavits in the possession of the employee 3    on which the employee will rely to support his 4    allegations, provided that the employer shall pay the 5    reasonable cost of reproduction thereof;6        (xii) a list of any reports, records, documents and 7    affidavits which the employee has demanded by subpoena and 8    on which he intends to rely to support his allegations;9        (xiii) a certification signed by the employee or his 10    representative that the employer has received the petition 11    with the required information 15 days before filing.12    Fifteen days after receipt by the employer of the petition 13with the required information the employee may file said 14petition and required information and shall serve notice of 15the filing upon the employer. The employer may file a motion 16addressed to the sufficiency of the petition. If an objection 17has been filed to the sufficiency of the petition, the 18arbitrator shall rule on the objection within 2 working days. 19If such an objection is filed, the time for filing the final 20decision of the Commission as provided in this paragraph shall 21be tolled until the arbitrator has determined that the 22petition is sufficient.23    The employer shall, within 15 days after receipt of the 24notice that such petition is filed, file with the Commission 25and serve on the employee or his representative a written 26response to each claim set forth in the petition, including   HB5508- 10 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1the legal and factual basis for each disputed allegation and 2the following information: (i) complete copies of any reports, 3records, documents and affidavits in the possession of the 4employer on which the employer intends to rely in support of 5his response, (ii) a list of any reports, records, documents 6and affidavits which the employer has demanded by subpoena and 7on which the employer intends to rely in support of his 8response, (iii) the name and address of each witness on whom 9the employer will rely to support his response, and (iv) the 10names and addresses of any medical practitioners selected by 11the employer pursuant to Section 12 of this Act and the time 12and place of any examination scheduled to be made pursuant to 13such Section.14    Any employer who does not timely file and serve a written 15response without good cause may not introduce any evidence to 16dispute any claim of the employee but may cross examine the 17employee or any witness brought by the employee and otherwise 18be heard.19    No document or other evidence not previously identified by 20either party with the petition or written response, or by any 21other means before the hearing, may be introduced into 22evidence without good cause. If, at the hearing, material 23information is discovered which was not previously disclosed, 24the Arbitrator may extend the time for closing proof on the 25motion of a party for a reasonable period of time which may be 26more than 30 days. No evidence may be introduced pursuant to   HB5508- 11 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1this paragraph as to permanent disability. No award may be 2entered for permanent disability pursuant to this paragraph. 3Either party may introduce into evidence the testimony taken 4by deposition of any medical practitioner.5    The Commission shall adopt rules, regulations and 6procedures whereby the final decision of the Commission is 7filed not later than 90 days from the date the petition for 8review is filed but in no event later than 180 days from the 9date the petition for an emergency hearing is filed with the 10Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission.11    All service required pursuant to this paragraph (b-1) must 12be by personal service or by certified mail and with evidence 13of receipt. In addition for the purposes of this paragraph, 14all service on the employer must be at the premises where the 15accident occurred if the premises are owned or operated by the 16employer. Otherwise service must be at the employee's 17principal place of employment by the employer. If service on 18the employer is not possible at either of the above, then 19service shall be at the employer's principal place of 20business. After initial service in each case, service shall be 21made on the employer's attorney or designated representative.22    (c)(1) At a reasonable time in advance of and in 23connection with the hearing under Section 19(e) or 19(h), the 24Commission may on its own motion order an impartial physical 25or mental examination of a petitioner whose mental or physical 26condition is in issue, when in the Commission's discretion it   HB5508- 12 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1appears that such an examination will materially aid in the 2just determination of the case. The examination shall be made 3by a member or members of a panel of physicians chosen for 4their special qualifications by the Illinois State Medical 5Society. The Commission shall establish procedures by which a 6physician shall be selected from such list.7    (2) Should the Commission at any time during the hearing 8find that compelling considerations make it advisable to have 9an examination and report at that time, the commission may in 10its discretion so order.11    (3) A copy of the report of examination shall be given to 12the Commission and to the attorneys for the parties.13    (4) Either party or the Commission may call the examining 14physician or physicians to testify. Any physician so called 15shall be subject to cross-examination.16    (5) The examination shall be made, and the physician or 17physicians, if called, shall testify, without cost to the 18parties. The Commission shall determine the compensation and 19the pay of the physician or physicians. The compensation for 20this service shall not exceed the usual and customary amount 21for such service.22    (6) The fees and payment thereof of all attorneys and 23physicians for services authorized by the Commission under 24this Act shall, upon request of either the employer or the 25employee or the beneficiary affected, be subject to the review 26and decision of the Commission.  HB5508- 13 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1    (d) If any employee shall persist in insanitary or 2injurious practices which tend to either imperil or retard his 3recovery or shall refuse to submit to such medical, surgical, 4or hospital treatment as is reasonably essential to promote 5his recovery, the Commission may, in its discretion, reduce or 6suspend the compensation of any such injured employee. 7However, when an employer and employee so agree in writing, 8the foregoing provision shall not be construed to authorize 9the reduction or suspension of compensation of an employee who 10is relying in good faith, on treatment by prayer or spiritual 11means alone, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a 12recognized church or religious denomination, by a duly 13accredited practitioner thereof.14    (e) This paragraph shall apply to all hearings before the 15Commission. Such hearings may be held in its office or 16elsewhere as the Commission may deem advisable. The taking of 17testimony on such hearings may be had before any member of the 18Commission. If a petition for review and agreed statement of 19facts or transcript of evidence is filed, as provided herein, 20the Commission shall promptly review the decision of the 21Arbitrator and all questions of law or fact which appear from 22the statement of facts or transcript of evidence.23    In all cases in which the hearing before the arbitrator is 24held after December 18, 1989, no additional evidence shall be 25introduced by the parties before the Commission on review of 26the decision of the Arbitrator. In reviewing decisions of an   HB5508- 14 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1arbitrator the Commission shall award such temporary 2compensation, permanent compensation and other payments as are 3due under this Act. The Commission shall file in its office its 4decision thereon, and shall immediately send to each party or 5his attorney a copy of such decision and a notification of the 6time when it was filed. Decisions shall be filed within 60 days 7after the Statement of Exceptions and Supporting Brief and 8Response thereto are required to be filed or oral argument 9whichever is later.10    In the event either party requests oral argument, such 11argument shall be had before a panel of 3 members of the 12Commission (or before all available members pursuant to the 13determination of 7 members of the Commission that such 14argument be held before all available members of the 15Commission) pursuant to the rules and regulations of the 16Commission. A panel of 3 members, which shall be comprised of 17not more than one representative citizen of the employing 18class and not more than one representative from a labor 19organization recognized under the National Labor Relations Act 20or an attorney who has represented labor organizations or has 21represented employees in workers' compensation cases, shall 22hear the argument; provided that if all the issues in dispute 23are solely the nature and extent of the permanent partial 24disability, if any, a majority of the panel may deny the 25request for such argument and such argument shall not be held; 26and provided further that 7 members of the Commission may   HB5508- 15 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1determine that the argument be held before all available 2members of the Commission. A decision of the Commission shall 3be approved by a majority of Commissioners present at such 4hearing if any; provided, if no such hearing is held, a 5decision of the Commission shall be approved by a majority of a 6panel of 3 members of the Commission as described in this 7Section. The Commission shall give 10 days' notice to the 8parties or their attorneys of the time and place of such taking 9of testimony and of such argument.10    In any case the Commission in its decision may find 11specially upon any question or questions of law or fact which 12shall be submitted in writing by either party whether ultimate 13or otherwise; provided that on issues other than nature and 14extent of the disability, if any, the Commission in its 15decision shall find specially upon any question or questions 16of law or fact, whether ultimate or otherwise, which are 17submitted in writing by either party; provided further that 18not more than 5 such questions may be submitted by either 19party. Any party may, within 20 days after receipt of notice of 20the Commission's decision, or within such further time, not 21exceeding 30 days, as the Commission may grant, file with the 22Commission either an agreed statement of the facts appearing 23upon the hearing, or, if such party shall so elect, a correct 24transcript of evidence of the additional proceedings presented 25before the Commission, in which report the party may embody a 26correct statement of such other proceedings in the case as   HB5508- 16 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1such party may desire to have reviewed, such statement of 2facts or transcript of evidence to be authenticated by the 3signature of the parties or their attorneys, and in the event 4that they do not agree, then the authentication of such 5transcript of evidence shall be by the signature of any member 6of the Commission.7    If a reporter does not for any reason furnish a transcript 8of the proceedings before the Arbitrator in any case for use on 9a hearing for review before the Commission, within the 10limitations of time as fixed in this Section, the Commission 11may, in its discretion, order a trial de novo before the 12Commission in such case upon application of either party. The 13applications for adjustment of claim and other documents in 14the nature of pleadings filed by either party, together with 15the decisions of the Arbitrator and of the Commission and the 16statement of facts or transcript of evidence hereinbefore 17provided for in paragraphs (b) and (c) shall be the record of 18the proceedings of the Commission, and shall be subject to 19review as hereinafter provided.20    At the request of either party or on its own motion, the 21Commission shall set forth in writing the reasons for the 22decision, including findings of fact and conclusions of law 23separately stated. The Commission shall by rule adopt a format 24for written decisions for the Commission and arbitrators. The 25written decisions shall be concise and shall succinctly state 26the facts and reasons for the decision. The Commission may   HB5508- 17 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1adopt in whole or in part, the decision of the arbitrator as 2the decision of the Commission. When the Commission does so 3adopt the decision of the arbitrator, it shall do so by order. 4Whenever the Commission adopts part of the arbitrator's 5decision, but not all, it shall include in the order the 6reasons for not adopting all of the arbitrator's decision. 7When a majority of a panel, after deliberation, has arrived at 8its decision, the decision shall be filed as provided in this 9Section without unnecessary delay, and without regard to the 10fact that a member of the panel has expressed an intention to 11dissent. Any member of the panel may file a dissent. Any 12dissent shall be filed no later than 10 days after the decision 13of the majority has been filed.14    Decisions rendered by the Commission and dissents, if any, 15shall be published together by the Commission. The conclusions 16of law set out in such decisions shall be regarded as 17precedents by arbitrators for the purpose of achieving a more 18uniform administration of this Act.19    (f) The decision of the Commission acting within its 20powers, according to the provisions of paragraph (d) of 21Section 4 and paragraph (e) of this Section shall, in the 22absence of fraud, be conclusive unless reviewed as in this 23paragraph hereinafter provided. However, the Arbitrator or the 24Commission may on his or its own motion, or on the motion of 25either party, correct any clerical error or errors in 26computation within 15 days after the date of receipt of any   HB5508- 18 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1award by such Arbitrator or any decision on review of the 2Commission and shall have the power to recall the original 3award on arbitration or decision on review, and issue in lieu 4thereof such corrected award or decision. Where such 5correction is made the time for review herein specified shall 6begin to run from the date of the receipt of the corrected 7award or decision.8        (1) Except in cases of claims against the State of 9    Illinois other than those claims under Section 18.1, in 10    which case the decision of the Commission shall not be 11    subject to judicial review, the Circuit Court of the 12    county where any of the parties defendant may be found, or 13    if none of the parties defendant can be found in this State 14    then the Circuit Court of the county where the accident 15    occurred, shall by summons to the Commission have power to 16    review all questions of law and fact presented by such 17    record.18        A proceeding for review shall be commenced within 20 19    days of the receipt of notice of the decision of the 20    Commission. The summons shall be issued by the clerk of 21    such court upon written request returnable on a designated 22    return day, not less than 10 or more than 60 days from the 23    date of issuance thereof, and the written request shall 24    contain the last known address of other parties in 25    interest and their attorneys of record who are to be 26    served by summons. Service upon any member of the   HB5508- 19 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1    Commission or the Secretary or the Assistant Secretary 2    thereof shall be service upon the Commission, and service 3    upon other parties in interest and their attorneys of 4    record shall be by summons, and such service shall be made 5    upon the Commission and other parties in interest by 6    mailing notices of the commencement of the proceedings and 7    the return day of the summons to the office of the 8    Commission and to the last known place of residence of 9    other parties in interest or their attorney or attorneys 10    of record. The clerk of the court issuing the summons 11    shall on the day of issue mail notice of the commencement 12    of the proceedings which shall be done by mailing a copy of 13    the summons to the office of the Commission, and a copy of 14    the summons to the other parties in interest or their 15    attorney or attorneys of record and the clerk of the court 16    shall make certificate that he has so sent said notices in 17    pursuance of this Section, which shall be evidence of 18    service on the Commission and other parties in interest.19        The Commission shall not be required to certify the 20    record of their proceedings to the Circuit Court, unless 21    the party commencing the proceedings for review in the 22    Circuit Court as above provided, shall file with the 23    Commission notice of intent to file for review in Circuit 24    Court. It shall be the duty of the Commission upon such 25    filing of notice of intent to file for review in the 26    Circuit Court to prepare a true and correct copy of such   HB5508- 20 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1    testimony and a true and correct copy of all other matters 2    contained in such record and certified to by the Secretary 3    or Assistant Secretary thereof. The changes made to this 4    subdivision (f)(1) by this amendatory Act of the 98th 5    General Assembly apply to any Commission decision entered 6    after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 7    98th General Assembly. 8        No request for a summons may be filed and no summons 9    shall issue unless the party seeking to review the 10    decision of the Commission shall exhibit to the clerk of 11    the Circuit Court proof of filing with the Commission of 12    the notice of the intent to file for review in the Circuit 13    Court or an affidavit of the attorney setting forth that 14    notice of intent to file for review in the Circuit Court 15    has been given in writing to the Secretary or Assistant 16    Secretary of the Commission.17        (2) No such summons shall issue unless the one against 18    whom the Commission shall have rendered an award for the 19    payment of money shall upon the filing of his written 20    request for such summons file with the clerk of the court a 21    bond conditioned that if he shall not successfully 22    prosecute the review, he will pay the award and the costs 23    of the proceedings in the courts. The amount of the bond 24    shall be fixed by any member of the Commission and the 25    surety or sureties of the bond shall be approved by the 26    clerk of the court. The acceptance of the bond by the clerk   HB5508- 21 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1    of the court shall constitute evidence of his approval of 2    the bond.3        The following shall not be required to file a bond to 4    secure the payment of the award and the costs of the 5    proceedings in the court to authorize the court to issue 6    such summons:7            (1) the State Treasurer, for a fund administered 8        by the State Treasurer ex officio against whom the 9        Commission shall have rendered an award for the 10        payment of money; and11            (2) a county, city, town, township, incorporated 12        village, school district, body politic, or municipal 13        corporation against whom the Commission shall have 14        rendered an award for the payment of money. 15        The court may confirm or set aside the decision of the 16    Commission. If the decision is set aside and the facts 17    found in the proceedings before the Commission are 18    sufficient, the court may enter such decision as is 19    justified by law, or may remand the cause to the 20    Commission for further proceedings and may state the 21    questions requiring further hearing, and give such other 22    instructions as may be proper. If the court affirms the 23    Commission's decision imposing fines on the employer under 24    subsection (d) of Section 4, the court shall enter 25    judgment against the employer in the amount of the fines 26    assessed by the Commission. Appeals shall be taken to the   HB5508- 22 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1    Appellate Court in accordance with Supreme Court Rules 2    22(g) and 303. Appeals shall be taken from the Appellate 3    Court to the Supreme Court in accordance with Supreme 4    Court Rule 315.5        It shall be the duty of the clerk of any court 6    rendering a decision affecting or affirming an award of 7    the Commission to promptly furnish the Commission with a 8    copy of such decision, without charge.9        The decision of a majority of the members of the panel 10    of the Commission, shall be considered the decision of the 11    Commission.12    (g) Except in the case of a claim against the State of 13Illinois, either party may present a certified copy of the 14award of the Arbitrator, or a certified copy of the decision of 15the Commission when the same has become final, when no 16proceedings for review are pending, providing for the payment 17of compensation according to this Act, to the Circuit Court of 18the county in which such accident occurred or either of the 19parties are residents, whereupon the court shall enter a 20judgment in accordance therewith. In a case where the employer 21refuses to pay compensation according to such final award or 22such final decision upon which such judgment is entered the 23court shall in entering judgment thereon, tax as costs against 24him the reasonable costs and attorney fees in the arbitration 25proceedings and in the court entering the judgment for the 26person in whose favor the judgment is entered, which judgment   HB5508- 23 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1and costs taxed as therein provided shall, until and unless 2set aside, have the same effect as though duly entered in an 3action duly tried and determined by the court, and shall with 4like effect, be entered and docketed. The Circuit Court shall 5have power at any time upon application to make any such 6judgment conform to any modification required by any 7subsequent decision of the Supreme Court upon appeal, or as 8the result of any subsequent proceedings for review, as 9provided in this Act.10    Judgment shall not be entered until 15 days' notice of the 11time and place of the application for the entry of judgment 12shall be served upon the employer by filing such notice with 13the Commission, which Commission shall, in case it has on file 14the address of the employer or the name and address of its 15agent upon whom notices may be served, immediately send a copy 16of the notice to the employer or such designated agent.17    (h) An agreement or award under this Act providing for 18compensation in installments, may at any time within 18 months 19after such agreement or award be reviewed by the Commission at 20the request of either the employer or the employee, on the 21ground that the disability of the employee has subsequently 22recurred, increased, diminished or ended.23    However, as to accidents occurring subsequent to July 1, 241955, which are covered by any agreement or award under this 25Act providing for compensation in installments made as a 26result of such accident, such agreement or award may at any   HB5508- 24 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1time within 30 months, or 60 months in the case of an award 2under Section 8(d)1, after such agreement or award be reviewed 3by the Commission at the request of either the employer or the 4employee on the ground that the disability of the employee has 5subsequently recurred, increased, diminished or ended.6    On such review, compensation payments may be 7re-established, increased, diminished or ended. The Commission 8shall give 15 days' notice to the parties of the hearing for 9review. Any employee, upon any petition for such review being 10filed by the employer, shall be entitled to one day's notice 11for each 100 miles necessary to be traveled by him in attending 12the hearing of the Commission upon the petition, and 3 days in 13addition thereto. Such employee shall, at the discretion of 14the Commission, also be entitled to 5 cents per mile 15necessarily traveled by him within the State of Illinois in 16attending such hearing, not to exceed a distance of 300 miles, 17to be taxed by the Commission as costs and deposited with the 18petition of the employer.19    When compensation which is payable in accordance with an 20award or settlement contract approved by the Commission, is 21ordered paid in a lump sum by the Commission, no review shall 22be had as in this paragraph mentioned.23    (i) Each party, upon taking any proceedings or steps 24whatsoever before any Arbitrator, Commission or court, shall 25file with the Commission his address, or the name and address 26of any agent upon whom all notices to be given to such party   HB5508- 25 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1shall be served, either personally or by registered mail, 2addressed to such party or agent at the last address so filed 3with the Commission. In the event such party has not filed his 4address, or the name and address of an agent as above provided, 5service of any notice may be had by filing such notice with the 6Commission.7    (j) Whenever in any proceeding testimony has been taken or 8a final decision has been rendered and after the taking of such 9testimony or after such decision has become final, the injured 10employee dies, then in any subsequent proceedings brought by 11the personal representative or beneficiaries of the deceased 12employee, such testimony in the former proceeding may be 13introduced with the same force and effect as though the 14witness having so testified were present in person in such 15subsequent proceedings and such final decision, if any, shall 16be taken as final adjudication of any of the issues which are 17the same in both proceedings.18    (k) In case where there has been any unreasonable or 19vexatious delay of payment or intentional underpayment of 20compensation, or proceedings have been instituted or carried 21on by the one liable to pay the compensation, which do not 22present a real controversy, but are merely frivolous or for 23delay, then the Commission may award compensation additional 24to that otherwise payable under this Act equal to 50% of the 25amount payable at the time of such award. Failure to pay 26compensation in accordance with the provisions of Section 8,   HB5508- 26 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1paragraph (b) of this Act, shall be considered unreasonable 2delay.3    When determining whether this subsection (k) shall apply, 4the Commission shall consider whether an Arbitrator has 5determined that the claim is not compensable or whether the 6employer has made payments under Section 8(j).7    (l) If the employee has made written demand for payment of 8benefits under Section 8(a) or Section 8(b), the employer 9shall have 14 days after receipt of the demand to set forth in 10writing the reason for the delay. In the case of demand for 11payment of medical benefits under Section 8(a), the time for 12the employer to respond shall not commence until the 13expiration of the allotted 30 days specified under Section 148.2(d). In case the employer or his or her insurance carrier 15shall without good and just cause fail, neglect, refuse, or 16unreasonably delay the payment of benefits under Section 8(a) 17or Section 8(b), the Arbitrator or the Commission shall allow 18to the employee additional compensation in the sum of $30 per 19day for each day that the benefits under Section 8(a) or 20Section 8(b) have been so withheld or refused, not to exceed 21$10,000. A delay in payment of 14 days or more shall create a 22rebuttable presumption of unreasonable delay. 23    (m) If the commission finds that an accidental injury was 24directly and proximately caused by the employer's wilful 25violation of a health and safety standard under the Health and 26Safety Act or the Occupational Safety and Health Act in force   HB5508- 27 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1at the time of the accident, the arbitrator or the Commission 2shall allow to the injured employee or his dependents, as the 3case may be, additional compensation equal to 25% of the 4amount which otherwise would be payable under the provisions 5of this Act exclusive of this paragraph. The additional 6compensation herein provided shall be allowed by an 7appropriate increase in the applicable weekly compensation 8rate.9    (n) Except as provided in subsection (n-5), after After 10June 30, 1984, decisions of the Illinois Workers' Compensation 11Commission reviewing an award of an arbitrator of the 12Commission shall draw interest at a rate equal to the yield on 13indebtedness issued by the United States Government with a 1426-week maturity next previously auctioned on the day on which 15the decision is filed. Said rate of interest shall be set forth 16in the Arbitrator's Decision. Interest shall be drawn from the 17date of the arbitrator's award on all accrued compensation due 18the employee through the day prior to the date of payments. 19However, when an employee appeals an award of an Arbitrator or 20the Commission, and the appeal results in no change or a 21decrease in the award, interest shall not further accrue from 22the date of such appeal.23    The employer or his insurance carrier may tender the 24payments due under the award to stop the further accrual of 25interest on such award notwithstanding the prosecution by 26either party of review, certiorari, appeal to the Supreme   HB5508- 28 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1Court or other steps to reverse, vacate or modify the award.2    (n-5) On and after July 1, 2026, if a public employer files 3a petition to review an award of an arbitrator of the 4Commission, the award shall draw interest, retroactive to the 5date of the injury, at a rate equal to 10% or at a rate equal 6to the yield on indebtedness issued by the United States 7Government with a 26-week maturity next previously auctioned 8on the date of the injury on the day on which the decision is 9filed, whichever is greater. The rate of interest shall be set 10forth in the Arbitrator's Decision. Interest shall be drawn 11from the date of the injury on all accrued compensation due the 12employee through the day prior to the date of payments.13    The public employer or the public employer's insurance 14carrier may tender the payments due under the award to stop the 15further accrual of interest on the award notwithstanding the 16prosecution by either party of review, certiorari, appeal to 17the Supreme Court, or other steps to reverse, vacate, or 18modify the award.19    This subsection applies to all cases in which a petition 20for review filed by a public employer is pending on July 1, 212026. 22    As used in this subsection, "public employer" means the 23State, unit of local government, or school district, or any 24agency or instrumentality thereof.25    (o) By the 15th day of each month each insurer providing 26coverage for losses under this Act shall notify each insured   HB5508- 29 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1employer of any compensable claim incurred during the 2preceding month and the amounts paid or reserved on the claim 3including a summary of the claim and a brief statement of the 4reasons for compensability. A cumulative report of all claims 5incurred during a calendar year or continued from the previous 6year shall be furnished to the insured employer by the insurer 7within 30 days after the end of that calendar year.8    The insured employer may challenge, in proceeding before 9the Commission, payments made by the insurer without 10arbitration and payments made after a case is determined to be 11noncompensable. If the Commission finds that the case was not 12compensable, the insurer shall purge its records as to that 13employer of any loss or expense associated with the claim, 14reimburse the employer for attorneys' fees arising from the 15challenge and for any payment required of the employer to the 16Rate Adjustment Fund or the Second Injury Fund, and may not 17reflect the loss or expense for rate making purposes. The 18employee shall not be required to refund the challenged 19payment. The decision of the Commission may be reviewed in the 20same manner as in arbitrated cases. No challenge may be 21initiated under this paragraph more than 3 years after the 22payment is made. An employer may waive the right of challenge 23under this paragraph on a case by case basis.24    (p) After filing an application for adjustment of claim 25but prior to the hearing on arbitration the parties may 26voluntarily agree to submit such application for adjustment of   HB5508- 30 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1claim for decision by an arbitrator under this subsection (p) 2where such application for adjustment of claim raises only a 3dispute over temporary total disability, permanent partial 4disability or medical expenses. Such agreement shall be in 5writing in such form as provided by the Commission. 6Applications for adjustment of claim submitted for decision by 7an arbitrator under this subsection (p) shall proceed 8according to rule as established by the Commission. The 9Commission shall promulgate rules including, but not limited 10to, rules to ensure that the parties are adequately informed 11of their rights under this subsection (p) and of the voluntary 12nature of proceedings under this subsection (p). The findings 13of fact made by an arbitrator acting within his or her powers 14under this subsection (p) in the absence of fraud shall be 15conclusive. However, the arbitrator may on his own motion, or 16the motion of either party, correct any clerical errors or 17errors in computation within 15 days after the date of receipt 18of such award of the arbitrator and shall have the power to 19recall the original award on arbitration, and issue in lieu 20thereof such corrected award. The decision of the arbitrator 21under this subsection (p) shall be considered the decision of 22the Commission and proceedings for review of questions of law 23arising from the decision may be commenced by either party 24pursuant to subsection (f) of Section 19. The Advisory Board 25established under Section 13.1 shall compile a list of 26certified Commission arbitrators, each of whom shall be   HB5508- 31 -LRB104 17990 SPS 31427 b1approved by at least 7 members of the Advisory Board. The 2chairman shall select 5 persons from such list to serve as 3arbitrators under this subsection (p). By agreement, the 4parties shall select one arbitrator from among the 5 persons 5selected by the chairman except that if the parties do not 6agree on an arbitrator from among the 5 persons, the parties 7may, by agreement, select an arbitrator of the American 8Arbitration Association, whose fee shall be paid by the State 9in accordance with rules promulgated by the Commission. 10Arbitration under this subsection (p) shall be voluntary.11(Source: P.A. 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 103-590, eff. 6-5-24.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.